Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 255.10 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
develop a form for use by each agency, board, commission, department
or other entity organized within the executive branch of state
government for use by such governmental entity in identifying
prospective vendors for contracts to manage federal funds if such
funds management is permissible pursuant to the federal law enabling
and transferring such funds for expenditure by the state
governmental entity. Each such governmental entity shall complete
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2590 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the form and submit it to the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services as required by the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services.
B. The form shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
1. The legal name of the entity proposing to manage the federal
funds pursuant to contract, including any trade name or similar name
which is not the formal legal name of the entity that will enter
into the contract;
2. The jurisdiction in which the prospective vendor entity was
originally incorporated or otherwise created pursuant to the laws of
the applicable jurisdiction;
3. The legal names of the principal officers of the prospective
vendor entity which proposes to manage the federal funds, which may
include, but shall not be limited to the chief executive officer,
the chief financial officer, the chief information or technology
officer and the chief operating officer;
4. A listing of the prior experience of the prospective vendor
entity or its officers or employees with regard to the management of
federal funds on behalf of any state or local government entity;
5. The most recently completed financial audit of the books and
records of the prospective vendor entity prior to the date as of
which the form prescribed pursuant to the provisions of this section
is submitted to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, in
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2590 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

case s involving a vendor with no prior experience in the management
of federal funds. No vendor shall be required to disclose
information which is proprietary or protected from disclosure by
private agreement or that is considered to be a trade secret.
6. Any and all pending civil cases, whether in federal court,
state court or the judicial system of any other country or nation
which identifies the prospective vendor entity as a defendant in a
proceeding related directly to the management of federal funds.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 255.11 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The forms submitted to the Office of Management and Enterprise
Servies as required by this act shall also be submitted to the
Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, and the Chairs
and Vice-Chairs of the standing committees of both chambers of the
Oklahoma Legislature responsible for appropriation and budget
matters.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
April 8, 2025 - DO PASS



SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2590 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)